Maine, session 132, LD160.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1260, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 27, §1 and affected by §10,
is repealed.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1405, sub-§3-A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 352, §6, is
further amended to read:
3-A. Fee. The fee for a duplicate registration certificate is $5. The fee for a duplicate
learner's permit, duplicate license or duplicate nondriver identification card is $5. The fee
for a duplicate license or duplicate nondriver identification card under section 1260 is $30.
The fee for the expedited issuance of a duplicate license or nondriver identification card,
including the expedited issuance of a duplicate license or nondriver identification card
under section 1260, is an additional $10. The reason for the expedited issuance must be
provided, and the Secretary of State shall determine if expedited issuance is warranted.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1406-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 27, §5 and
affected by §10, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (2).
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1406-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 27, §5 and
affected by §10, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (2).
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1406-A, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 352, §7, is
repealed.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §1406-A, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2019, c. 352, §7, is
repealed.
Sec. 7. 29-A MRSA §1410, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 27, §7 and affected
by §10, is repealed.